Washington statutes.
RCW 42.56.370

Client records of domestic violence programs, or community sexual assault programs or services for underserved populations.

Client records maintained by an agency that is a domestic violence program as defined in RCW 70.123.020 or 70.123.075 or a community sexual assault program or services for underserved populations as defined in RCW 70.125.030 are exempt from disclosure under this chapter.

[ 2012 c 29 s 13; 2005 c 274 s 417.]